Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2536
Election Act; applicability.

The Election Act, so far as applicable and when not in conflict with sections 18-2501 to 18-2531, shall apply to voting on ordinances by the registered voters pursuant to such sections.

Laws 1982, LB 807, § 36;

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 506.

Election Act, see section 32-101.